Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1650
Jurors; qualifications; disqualifications; excused or exempt, when.

(1) All citizens of the United States residing in any of the counties of this state who are over the age of nineteen years, able to read, speak, and understand the English language, and free from all disqualifications set forth under this section and from all other legal exceptions are qualified to serve on all grand and petit juries in their respective counties. Persons disqualified to serve as either grand or petit jurors are: (a) Judges of any court, (b) clerks of the Supreme or district courts, (c) sheriffs, (d) jailers, (e) persons, or the spouse of any such persons, who are parties to suits pending in the county of his, her, or their residence for trial to that jury panel, (f) persons who have been convicted of a felony when such conviction has not been set aside or a pardon issued, and (g) persons who are subject to liability for the commission of any offense which by special provision of law disqualifies them. Spouses shall not serve as jurors on the same panel. Persons who are incapable, by reason of physical or mental disability, of rendering satisfactory jury service shall not be qualified to serve on a jury, but a person claiming this disqualification shall be required to submit a physician's certificate as to the disability and the certifying physician is subject to inquiry by the court at its discretion. A nursing mother who requests to be excused shall be excused from jury service until she is no longer nursing her child, but the mother shall be required to submit a physician's certificate in support of her request. A person who is serving on active duty as a member of the United States Armed Forces who requests to be exempt shall be exempt from jury service, but such person shall be required to submit documentation of his or her active-duty status in support of his or her request.

(2) The district court or any judge thereof may exercise the power of excusing any grand or petit juror or any person summoned for grand or petit jury service upon a showing of undue hardship, extreme inconvenience, or public necessity for such period as the court deems necessary. At the conclusion of such period the person shall reappear for jury service in accordance with the court's direction. All excuses and the grounds for such excuses shall be entered upon the record of the court. In districts having more than one judge of the district court, the court may by rule or order assign or delegate to the presiding judge or any one or more judges the sole authority to grant such excuses.

(3) No qualified potential juror is exempt from jury service, except that any person seventy years of age or older who makes a request to be exempt to the court at the time the juror qualification form is filed with the jury commissioner or who makes such a request in writing after being qualified and summoned shall be exempt from serving on grand and petit juries.

(4) A physician's certificate or other documentation or information submitted by a person in support of a claim of disqualification by reason of physical or mental disability or due to such person's status as a nursing mother is not a public record as defined in section 84-712.01 and is not subject to disclosure under sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

R.S.1867, Code § 657, p. 509;

Laws 1911, c. 171, § 1, p. 548;

R.S.1913, § 8135;

Laws 1917, c. 139, § 1, p. 325;

C.S.1922, § 9071;

C.S.1929, § 20-1601;

Laws 1939, c. 18, § 1, p. 98;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 20-1601;

Laws 1943, c. 45, § 1, p. 191;

R.S.1943, § 25-1601;

Laws 1953, c. 72, § 1, p. 224;

Laws 1955, c. 90, § 1, p. 264;

Laws 1959, c. 106, § 1, p. 433;

Laws 1959, c. 143, § 1, p. 551;

Laws 1969, c. 189, § 1, p. 780;

Laws 1979, LB 234, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 733, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 113, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 19, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1601;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 7.

For exemption of National Guard, see section 55-173.

1. Competency

2. Selection

1. Competency

Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, not every person who works in a jail is necessarily a "jailer". State v. Jacob, 253 Neb. 950, 574 N.W.2d 117 (1998).

Holders of assessable policies issued by a mutual insurance company named as a party in an action may serve as jurors if the policyholder can decide the case fairly solely upon the evidence presented at trial. Howard v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co., 242 Neb. 624, 496 N.W.2d 862 (1993).

Although several husbands and wives were on the same jury panel, there was no evidence that any statutorily disqualified person actually served as a juror at the trial. Schroll v. Fulton, 213 Neb. 310, 328 N.W.2d 780 (1983).

Defendant not denied fair trial by statute limiting eligibility for jury duty according to age. State v. Schwartz, 199 Neb. 17, 255 N.W.2d 859 (1977).

Excluding nineteen and twenty year olds from petit and grand jury service does not violate constitutional due process guarantees. State v. Foster, 196 Neb. 332, 242 N.W.2d 876 (1976).

District court may excuse for cause any grand juror who has been summoned. State v. Abboud, 181 Neb. 84, 147 N.W.2d 152 (1966).

Nothing in this section disqualified a negro from jury service. Bell v. State, 159 Neb. 474, 67 N.W.2d 762 (1954).

Failure of counsel to again inquire of juror, incompetent and ineligible because of his age, was not waived, where trial court has asked the qualifying questions and juror failed to disclose his ineligibility, when fact is unknown to counsel and parties. Berg v. Griffiths, 126 Neb. 235, 252 N.W. 918 (1934).

Juror is presumed to be qualified at time of serving in absence of showing to contrary. Seaton v. State, 109 Neb. 828, 192 N.W. 501 (1923).

Mere impairment of eyesight does not render juror incompetent. Reed v. State, 75 Neb. 509, 106 N.W. 649 (1906).

Juror must be qualified voter. Russell v. State, 62 Neb. 512, 87 N.W. 344 (1901).

Juror must be elector of the county wherein he is called to serve. Hart v. State, 14 Neb. 572, 16 N.W. 905 (1883).

Negroes are not incompetent. Brittle v. People, 2 Neb. 198 (1873).

2. Selection

Statute exempting certain occupations from jury duty upheld against motion to quash jury panel. State v. Wounded Arrow, 207 Neb. 544, 300 N.W.2d 19 (1980).

It is not error to overrule challenge to the array that does not plead facts showing in what way statute was violated. Uerling v. State, 125 Neb. 374, 250 N.W. 243 (1933).

Failure to interrogate juror on voir dire as to his competency and to challenge for that cause constitutes waiver of juror's incompetency. Flannigan v. State, 124 Neb. 748, 248 N.W. 92 (1933).

Evidence was insufficient to support challenge to the array on ground jury panel was improperly selected. Nelson v. State, 118 Neb. 812, 226 N.W. 438 (1929).